Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

4-1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this title, the term:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture of the State of Georgia.

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture of the State of Georgia.

4-1-2.
State veterinarian — Qualifications; term of office; assistants.

The Commissioner is empowered to employ a licensed veterinarian, with not less than five years’ practical experience in the general practice of his profession, as state veterinarian. The state veterinarian shall hold his office for the same term as the Commissioner unless removed sooner at the direction of the Commissioner.

The Commissioner may employ such other assistants as may be necessary in carrying out the duties imposed on him by this title.

The Commissioner shall have the power to prescribe the powers, duties, and functions of the state veterinarian and his assistants.

History.

Ga. L. 1910, p. 125, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1929, p. 336, § 1; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 97; Code 1933, §§ 62-902, 62-903; Ga. L. 1935, p. 167, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1937, p. 850, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 1941, p. 238, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 4.

Cross references.

License requirements for veterinarians, §

43-50-20

et seq.

Code Commission notes.

The title of the state veterinarian was changed to “chief veterinarian” pursuant to Ga. L. 1941, p. 238, § 2. However, the title was changed back to “state veterinarian” administratively and is so used in this Code section.

4-1-3.
State veterinarian — Duties generally.

The duties of the state veterinarian are to administer the business and affairs of the Animal Industry Division of the department. This includes enforcing the regulations and directing the programs designed to control and eradicate animal disease, directing the proper interstate movement of livestock, enforcing Article 3 of Chapter 2 of Title 26, the “Georgia Meat Inspection Act,” promoting livestock marketing, and licensing and bonding livestock markets, dealers, and meat packers.

History.

Ga. L. 1910, p. 125, § 2; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 97; Code 1933, § 62-901; Ga. L. 1935, p. 167, §§ 2, 4; Ga. L. 1937, p. 850, § 2; Ga. L. 1941, p. 238, §§ 1, 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 4.

4-1-4.
Presumption as to livestock killed or injured by poisons.

If livestock is killed or injured by poisoned crops or other poison on the property, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the poisoning was done by the person in possession and charge of the property.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1403; Code 1868, § 1460; Code 1873, § 1447; Code 1882, § 1447; Civil Code 1895, § 1768; Civil Code 1910, § 2027; Code 1933, § 62-803.

4-1-5.
Use, possession, delivery, or sale of hog cholera vaccine, serum, or virus.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association or any agency, department, or other political subdivision of a state, county, or municipal government or other entity to use, possess, sell, offer or hold for sale, deliver, distribute, introduce, or deliver for introduction into commerce hog cholera vaccine, serum, or virus in this state. A violation of this subsection shall constitute a misdemeanor.

The Commissioner shall seize and destroy any hog cholera vaccine, serum, or virus found in this state.

History.

Code 1933, §§ 62-1201, 62-1202, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 280, § 1.

4-1-6.
Obstruction, interference, or hindrance of duties.

It shall be unlawful for any person to obstruct, interfere, or hinder the Commissioner, his or her designated agents and employees, an animal control officer, or a dog control officer in the lawful discharge of his or her official duties pursuant to this title. Any person convicted of a violation of this Code section shall be punished as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 16-10-24.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-1-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 754, § 2.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 754, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Animal Protection Act of 2000.’ ”

Law reviews.

For note on 2000 enactment of this Code section, see 17 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 12 (2000).

4-1-7.
Investigation prior to charges of cruelty to animals in animal husbandry; “food animal” defined.

Prior to the filing of criminal charges for a violation under Code Section 16-12-4 with regard to conduct involving animal husbandry of food animals, a law enforcement officer shall consult with a licensed and accredited Category II veterinarian employed by the department or other agency of the State of Georgia whose primary practice and responsibilities are food animal veterinary medicine to confirm whether or not such conduct is in accordance with customary and standard practice. For purposes of this Code section, the term “food animal” means any animal that is raised for the production of an edible product intended for consumption by humans or is itself intended for consumption by humans. Such term shall include, but is not limited to, eggs, beef or dairy cattle, swine, sheep, goats, poultry, nonornamental fish, and any other animal designated by such veterinarian as a food animal.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-1-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 770, § 1/HB 956.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2018.